Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 2.7
MISSING PERSON REPORTS -
UNIDENTIFIED HUMAN REMAINS

Section

16-2.7-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.

"Missing person" means a person whose whereabouts are unknown and whose safety or welfare is the subject of concern.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 394, § 1, effective April 6.

16-2.7-102. Missing person reports - acceptance.

Any person with relevant, credible information suggesting that a person is missing may make a missing person report to a law enforcement agency.

A law enforcement agency shall accept without delay a missing person report that is submitted in person if:

The missing person resides, or was last known to reside, in Colorado; or

There is credible information indicating that the missing person was last believed to be in Colorado.

Each law enforcement agency shall accept a missing person report submitted by telephone or by electronic or other media if:

The report meets the conditions of subsection (2)(a) or (2)(b) of this section; and

Acceptance of the report by telephone or by electronic or other media is consistent with the law enforcement agency's policies or practices.

A law enforcement agency shall not refuse to accept a missing person report on the basis that the missing person has not yet been missing for any length of time.

Notwithstanding the requirements in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a law enforcement agency is not required to accept a missing person report if:

The person is the subject of a missing person report under investigation by another law enforcement agency within this state or another law enforcement agency has indicated that it intends to accept a missing person report for the person;

The law enforcement agency knows the location of the person reported missing or the agency can confirm the safe status of the person;

The individual reporting a person as missing is unable to articulate a bonafide relationship with the person or a legitimate rationale for concern;

The law enforcement agency suspects, and can articulate, that the person reported as missing is being sought for reasons of harassment, stalking, retaliation, court testimony, debt collection, or any action in defiance of a protection order; or

Any other articulable extenuating circumstance not inconsistent with this section exists that makes accepting the report impractical or unreasonable and the law enforcement agency documents the circumstance.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 394, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2022:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (3), and (5) amended, (SB 22-095), ch. 70, p. 364, § 2, effective April 7.

16-2.7-103. Missing person reports - response.

Upon receiving a report of a missing person, a law enforcement agency shall assess the information received from the reporting person and other available information. The law enforcement agency shall then determine the best course of action based on the circumstances.

If the missing person is eighteen years of age or older, the law enforcement agency shall, within eight hours after receiving the report, enter any relevant information into the Colorado crime information center database and, as appropriate, contact other law enforcement agencies that may assist in locating the missing person.

If the missing person is under eighteen years of age, the law enforcement agency shall, within two hours after receiving the report, notify the Colorado bureau of investigation pursuant to section 24-33.5-415.1 (3) and enter any relevant information into the Colorado crime information center database; or

If the missing person is under eighteen years of age and under the legal custody of the state department of human services or a county department of human or social services, the law enforcement agency shall, within two hours after receiving notification pursuant to section 19-1-115.3, notify the Colorado bureau of investigation and enter any relevant information into the Colorado crime information center database.

If the missing person is an indigenous person, the best course of action for the law enforcement agency includes appropriate communications with other law enforcement agencies that may assist in locating the missing indigenous person. Additionally, the law enforcement agency shall, within eight hours after receiving a report of a missing adult or within two hours after receiving a report of a missing child, notify the Colorado bureau of investigation.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 395, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2015:

Entire section amended, (HB 15-1078), ch. 41, p. 101, § 2, effective January 1, 2016.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-095), ch. 70, p. 365, § 3, effective April 7; (3) added, (SB 22-150), ch. 466, p. 3317, § 5, effective June 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-150, see section 1 of chapter 466, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

16-2.7-104. Unidentified human remains - reporting - DNA samples.

Except as provided in section 24-80-1303, C.R.S., with regard to anthropological investigations, a person who has custody of unidentified human remains shall immediately notify the coroner or medical examiner of the county in which the remains are located and the sheriff, police chief, or land managing agency official in accordance with section 24-80-1302 (1), C.R.S.

If a coroner or medical examiner takes legal custody of unidentified human remains pursuant to section 24-80-1302 (2), C.R.S., or section 30-10-606 (1.2), C.R.S., the coroner or medical examiner shall make reasonable attempts to identify the human remains. These attempts may include, but need not be limited to, obtaining:

Photographs of the human remains prior to an autopsy;

Dental or skeletal X rays of the human remains;

Photographs of items found with the human remains;

Fingerprints from the human remains;

Samples of tissue suitable for DNA typing from the human remains;

Samples of whole bone or hair from the human remains suitable for DNA typing.

If a coroner or medical examiner takes legal custody of unidentified human remains pursuant to section 24-80-1302 (2), C.R.S., or section 30-10-606 (1.2), C.R.S., the coroner or medical examiner shall:

Enter information concerning the physical appearance and structure of the unidentified human remains, including DNA typing information, into the national crime information center database; or

Work with law enforcement officials to ensure that information concerning the physical appearance and structure of the unidentified human remains, including DNA typing information, is entered into the national crime information center database.

A coroner or medical examiner shall neither dispose of nor engage in actions that will materially affect unidentified human remains before the coroner or medical examiner:

Obtains from the unidentified human remains samples suitable for DNA identification and archiving, if possible;

Obtains photographs of the unidentified human remains; and

Exhausts all other appropriate steps for identification of the human remains.

Until all available information concerning the physical appearance and structure of unidentified human remains is entered into the national crime information center database, cremation or natural reduction of unidentified human remains is prohibited.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added, p. 395, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2021:

(5) amended, (SB 21-006), ch. 123, p. 496, § 21, effective September 7.